Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1211.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "medical assistance" or "Children's Health Insurance Program managed care plan" in section 635.9(c) of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, added July 1, 2024 (P.L.441, No.39), is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 635.9. Coverage for Biomarker Testing.--* * *(b.1) Subject to Federal approval, as necessary, subsection 12345678910111213141516171819202122 (b) shall apply to the same services provided to medical assistance participants under Article IV of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code.(c) The terms in this section shall be given the same definitions as the terms defined pursuant to section 2102 unless otherwise noted. As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Medical assistance[" or "] or Children's Health Insurance Program managed care plan." A health care plan that uses a gatekeeper to manage the utilization of health care services, including biomarker testing, by medical assistance or Children's Health Insurance Program enrollees, and integrates the financing and delivery of health care services, including biomarker testing.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1211PN1497 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718